Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-21,258
Environmental audit; use as evidence; exceptions.

The protection created by section 25-21,256 does not apply to:

(1) Documents or information required to be developed, maintained, or reported pursuant to any environmental requirements;

(2) Documents or other information required to be available or furnished to a regulatory agency pursuant to any environmental requirements or any other law;

(3) Documents or information maintained or developed relating to grants or other financial assistance sponsored by the state or federal government;

(4) Information obtained by a regulatory agency through observation, inspection, sampling, or monitoring pursuant to an environmental requirement; or

(5) Information obtained through any source independent of the environmental audit.

Laws 1998, LB 395, § 6.